Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska40-113
Indivisible homestead; sale; surplus proceeds; protection.

The money paid to the claimant is entitled, for the period of six months thereafter, to the same protection against legal process and the voluntary disposition of the claimant which the law gives to the homestead.

Laws 1879, § 13, p. 60;

R.S.1913, § 3088;

C.S.1922, § 2828;

C.S.1929, § 40-113;

R.S.1943, § 40-113.

Sheriff's deed on execution sale of homestead passes title to purchaser, where homestead interest is extinguished by mortgage thereof. Hess v. Eselin, 110 Neb. 590, 194 N.W. 469 (1923).